Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2803
Religious association; affiliated with other association; withdrawal; use of name.

Whenever any religious association, as defined in subdivision (1) or (2) of section 21-2801, shall have been affiliated with a conference, missionary society, state convention, or other body which is incorporated as the statewide cooperative agency of affiliated religious associations as defined in subdivision (1) or (2) of section 21-2801, and while so affiliated and with the assistance and cooperation of such statewide denominational cooperative agency has acquired property and caused title to the same to be vested in the name of such local association using in whole or in part the denominational designation of the denomination of such statewide denominational cooperative agency and thereafter, after a substantial change in the membership, such local religious association shall withdraw from and terminate its affiliation with the statewide denominational cooperative agency then such religious society, so far as title to the property acquired during such cooperation is concerned, shall be deemed to have ceased to exist or maintain its organization, within the meaning of section 21-2801, and shall not be thereafter entitled to use in the name of such religious association the characteristic denominational designation or other words calculated to induce the belief that it is in any way belonging to or affiliated with the denomination maintaining such a statewide cooperative agency.

Laws 1967, c. 105, § 20, p. 335;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 21-1995.